Utah statutes.
10-2-711.   Dissolution by the county legislative body.
(1) (a)  A municipality having fewer than 50 residents may be dissolved on
application to the district court by the county legislative body of the county
where the municipality is located.
(b) (i)  The population figure under Subsection (1)(a) shall be derived from
the most recent official census or census estimate of the United States Bureau
of the Census.
(ii)  If the population figure is not available from the United States Bureau
of the Census, the population figure shall be derived from the estimate from
the Utah Population Estimates Committee.
(2)  Notice of the application shall be served on the municipality in the
manner prescribed by law or by publication in the manner provided by law if
the municipal authorities cannot be served.
(3)  The district court may enter an order approving the dissolution of the
municipality on a finding that the existence of the municipality serves no
valid municipal purpose, its existence is a sham, or on a clear and convincing
showing that the best interests of the community would be served by the
dissolution.
(4)  If the municipality is dissolved, the district court shall wind down the
affairs and dissolve the municipality as quickly as possible in the same
manner as is provided in Sections 10-2-705 through 10-2-709.
